District of Columbia statutes.
1-1314

Public ways.

All spaces on any duly recorded plat of land thereon designated as streets, avenues, or alleys shall thereupon become public ways, provided they are made in conformity with § 1-1313.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1428, ch. 854, § 1602
1981 Ed., § 1-914.
1973 Ed., § 1-614.